Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4017
Agent's liability.

An agent that violates the Nebraska Uniform
Power of Attorney Act is liable to the principal or the principal's successors
in interest for the amount required to:

(1) Restore the value
of the principal's property to what it would have been had the violation not
occurred; and

(2)
In a judicial proceeding involving the administration of a power of attorney,
the court, as justice may require, may award costs and expenses, including
reasonable attorney's fees to any party, to be paid by another party.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 17.